Washington statutes.
RCW 35.47.020

Declaration of obsolescence and cancellation upon distribution of moneys, untimely presentment, or lack of money in local improvement fund.

After the city or town having said bonds or warrants referred to in RCW 35.47.010 has distributed the money in a local improvement district fund in accordance with RCW 35.47.010, or such bonds or warrants are not presented for payment within one year after the last date of publication of notice provided for in RCW 35.47.010, such city or town may, by ordinance, declare such bonds and warrants, without any reference to numerical order, to be obsolete, cancel the same, and terminate all accounting thereon, and clear such bonds and warrants off their records including any unguaranteed bonds or warrants outstanding against districts in which there remains no money in the given local improvement fund.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 6 s 2.]